Maryland, session 2026, HB1423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Health shall convene a Workgroup on
Home– and Community–Based Services.
(b) The Workgroup shall include the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Aging, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) one representative of the HealthChoice Program within the Maryland
Department of Health, designated by the Secretary of Health;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1423*

HOUSE BILL 1423
(7) the State Long–Term Care Ombudsman, or the State Long–Term Care
Ombudsman’s designee; and
(8) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of a local health department;
(ii) one representative of a local area agency on aging;
(iii) one representative of an older adult advocacy organization who
is a licensed social worker;
(iv) one representative of Maryland Legal Aid;
(v) one representative of an assisted living program located in the
State;
(vi) one representative of a medical day care provider in the State;
(vii) one representative of an organization that provides case
management services to older adults in the State;
(viii) one representative of a Senior Center Plus located in the State;
(ix) one representative of a behavior consultation provider located in
the State;
(x) one representative of a nurse monitoring program in the State;
(xi) one representative of an organization providing environmental
assessments and environmental adaptations in the State; and
(xii) one representative of an agency that provides personal care
services.
(c) The Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee, shall chair the
Workgroup.
(d) The Maryland Department of Health shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.

HOUSE BILL 1423 3
(f) (1) The Workgroup shall review and evaluate the following programs:
(i) Community First Choice Program;
(ii) Community Personal Assistance Services Program;
(iii) Home and Community–Based Options Waiver;
(iv) Increased Community Services Program; and
(v) Medical Day Care Services Waiver.
(2) In reviewing and evaluating the programs listed in paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Workgroup shall review and as appropriate make recommendations to
improve:
(i) eligibility requirements;
(ii) the current process for applying for and receiving services under
the programs;
(iii) the average time it takes for an individual to receive services
after an application is submitted;
(iv) barriers to accessing services;
(v) the number of individuals currently on a wait list to receive
services;
(vi) rates of turnover for staff reviewing and processing applications;
(vii) geographic diversity of program providers and recipients;
(viii) reimbursement rates for providers; and
(ix) any other issues identified by the Workgroup.
(g) On or before October 1, 2027, the Maryland Department of Health shall
submit a report of the findings and recommendations of the Workgroup to the Governor
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Finance
Committee and the House Health Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of September
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.